Connecticut, session 2026, HB05246.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
Section 1. Subparagraph (B) of subdivision (4) of subsection (d) of
section 16-50mm of the 2026 supplement to the general statutes is
repealed and the following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective from
passage):
(B) Any evaluation by the department or the Office of Consumer
Counsel and any draft report resulting from that evaluation must be
completed and shared with the electric distribution companies not later
than ninety days prior to an electric distribution company's filing of an
application or petition before the Connecticut Siting Council, [;]
provided [, however, that] the electric distribution company informs the
department and the Office of Consumer Counsel of the anticipated filing
date not less than twelve months in advance of such filing date.
Sec. 2. Subdivision (1) of subsection (b) of section 16-245i of the 2026
supplement to the general statutes is repealed and the following is
substituted in lieu thereof (Effective from passage):
(b) (1) Notwithstanding any general or special law, rule [,] or

House Bill No. 5246
regulation to the contrary, except as otherwise provided in this
subsection with respect to transition property that has been made the
basis for the issuance of rate reduction bonds, the financing orders and
the competitive transition assessment shall be irrevocable and the
authority shall not have authority either by rescinding, altering [,] or
amending the financing order or otherwise, to revalue or revise for rate-
making purposes the stranded costs and financed utility services, or the
costs of providing, recovering, financing [,] or refinancing the stranded
costs and financed utility services, the amount of the economic recovery
transfer or the amount of disbursements to the General Fund from
proceeds of rate reduction bonds substituted for such disbursements in
furtherance of the Conservation and Load Management Plan
established by section 16-245m, and from the Clean Energy Fund
established by section 16-245n, determine that the competitive transition
assessment is unjust or unreasonable, or in any way reduce or impair
the value of transition property either directly or indirectly by taking the
competitive transition assessment into account when setting other rates
for the electric distribution company; nor shall the amount of revenues
arising with respect thereto be subject to reduction, impairment,
postponement [,] or termination.
Sec. 3. Subsection (f) of section 16a-3v of the 2026 supplement to the
general statutes is repealed and the following is substituted in lieu
thereof (Effective from passage):
(f) Not later than April 1, 2026, and annually thereafter through April
1, 2041, the Commissioner of Energy and Environmental Protection, in
coordination with the Public Utilities Regulatory Authority, shall report
on (1) the annual load factor and daily load factors for the prior calendar
year for each electric distribution company, (2) any policies and
strategies adopted through an authority proceeding to promote the
achievement of the system efficiency goal established in subsection (b)
of this section, including the costs and benefits of any program
Public Act No. 26-30 2 of 3

House Bill No. 5246
implemented pursuant to this section, and (3) any cost-effective policies
or programs the legislature may adopt to promote the achievement of
such system efficiency goal. The commissioner may consult with, and
request data from, the electric distribution companies to assist in the
preparation of such report. The commissioner shall submit such report,
in accordance with the provisions of section 11-4a, to the joint standing
committee of the General Assembly having cognizance of matters
[related] relating to energy and technology.
Governor's Action:
Approved May 20, 2026
Public Act No. 26-30 3 of 3